District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-924

Subscribers.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 485, ch. 397, § 24
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-924.
1981 Ed., § 29-1124.
1973 Ed., § 29-824.